New Jersey, session 222, A3097.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   Section 6 of P.L.1992, c.67 (C.52:31-39) is amended to read as follows: 6.   a.   It shall be the duty of the commission and its respective subcommittees to: (1)   maintain, monitor and preserve the architectural, historical, cultural and artistic integrity of any completed project for the restoration, preservation and improvement of the State capitol complex and to safeguard any related artifacts, documents and objects; (2)   maintain custody of the State capitol complex, with exclusive jurisdiction with respect to its management and operation and with consideration for the environmental sustainability thereof , including maintenance, repair, renovation, improvement, security, parking, furnishing, artifact displays, and space utilization; [and] (3)   consult with the Capital City Redevelopment Corporation, established pursuant to P.L.1987, c.58 (C.52:9Q-9 et seq.), regarding matters of common concern ; and (4)   (a)   adopt and implement, and revise as necessary at least every four years, an environmental sustainability plan for the State capitol complex in accordance with the requirements of section 2 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill); and (b)   issue an annual progress report on the implementation of the environmental sustainability plan, which shall be provided to the public upon request and free of charge, and shall be posted on the internet websites of the Governor and the Legislature . b.   The exclusive responsibility to carry out these duties shall repose with the commission with respect to common facilities; the subcommittee on executive branch facility management with respect to executive branch facilities; and the subcommittee on legislative branch facility management with respect to legislative branch facilities. (cf: P.L.1992, c.67, s.6) 2.  (New section)  The environmental sustainability plan for the State capitol complex, adopted and implemented by the commission pursuant to paragraph (4) of subsection a. of section 6 of P.L.1992, c.67 (C.52:31-39), shall include: a. Initiatives to improve energy savings and efficiency, including alternative electric energy, increase use of Energy Star products, and make other technology upgrades; b.  Water conservation techniques; c. Applicable principles set forth in the Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design Green Building Rating System established by the United States Green Building Council, or a comparable nationally recognized, accepted, and appropriate sustainable development rating system; d. Involvement of State capitol complex food services, including the consideration of locally produced foods and sustainable serviceware products, such as Jersey Fresh food products and compostable utensils and other serviceware products; e. Consideration of methods to lower the level of carbon emissions and reduce the carbon footprint of the State capitol complex, including alternatives such as planting trees and purchasing carbon credits to offset emissions; f.  Establishment of performance measures to track the progress of each aspect of the environmental sustainability plan, including the management and operation of the State capitol complex in consideration of the plan as required pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection a. of section 6 of P.L.1992, c.67 (C.52:31-39); and g.   An estimate of any expenditure increases needed to implement the environmental sustainability plan, and an identification of potential funding sources for the expenditure increases. 3.  Section 7 of P.L.1992, c.67 (C.52:31-40) is amended to read as follows: 7.  a. The commission or any subcommittee may enter into agreements with other State agencies or private vendors for the performance of any function or the provision of any service relating to the custody, management or operation of the State capitol complex. b.    The commission or any subcommittee may enter into agreements with any State agency with respect to the joint management and use of facilities or systems which serve both the capitol complex and buildings under the custody of the agency. c.     The commission shall be subject to the provisions of subtitle 5 [.] of Title 52 of the Revised Statutes with respect to contracting and, as appropriate, shall consider the environmental sustainability plan adopted pursuant to paragraph (4) of subsection a. of section 6 of P.L.1992, c.67 (C.52:31-39) prior to entering into any contract. d.      The commission shall appoint an advisory committee of experts in environmental sustainability, which shall include, but not be limited to, a representative of the Department of Environmental Protection, to assist the commission in the preparation and implementation of the environmental sustainability plan to be adopted pursuant to paragraph (4) of subsection a. of section 6 of P.L.1992, c.67 . (cf:  P.L.1992, c.67, s.7) 4.  Section 8 of P.L.1992, c.67 (C.52:31-41) is amended to read as follows: 8. Upon completion of any project for the restoration, preservation [and] , improvement , and environmental sustainability of the State capitol complex, no alteration of any element of the project shall be made without the approval of the commission or the appropriate subcommittee. (cf: P.L.1992, c.67, s.8) 5.    This act shall take effect immediately.